District of Columbia statutes.
12-308

Actions by the United States.

Sections 12-301 , 12-302 , 12-305 , and 12-307 do not apply to an action in which the United States is the real and not merely the nominal plaintiff.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 511, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 12-308.
1973 Ed., § 12-308.